Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 2

Ordinance Summons

7-63-201. Sanitation, litter control and animal control — Issuance of summons — Copies.

Notwithstanding §7-63-101, any municipal, metropolitan or city government may designate by ordinance or resolution certain municipal enforcement officers in the areas of sanitation, litter control, and animal control who may not arrest or issue citations in lieu of arrests pursuant to part 1 of this chapter, but who, upon witnessing a violation of any ordinance, law or regulation of that municipal, metropolitan or city government, may issue an ordinance summons, leaving a copy with the offender, showing the offense charged and the time and place when such offender is to appear in court.

Acts 1986, ch. 832, § 2.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1986, 54 Tenn. L. Rev. 457 (1987).

7-63-202. Treatment as citation in lieu of arrest.

Such ordinance summons shall be treated as a citation in lieu of arrest as provided for in §§7-63-102 and7-63-103.

Acts 1986, ch. 832, § 3.

7-63-203. Refusal to sign agreement to appear in court — Arrest.

In the event the offender refuses to sign the ordinance summons agreement to appear in court, the municipal enforcement officer in whose presence the violation is committed may have a summons issued by the clerk of the municipal, metropolitan, or city court, or the municipal enforcement officer may seek the assistance of a police or peace officer to witness the violation, who may issue a citation in lieu of arrest for the violation or make arrest for failure to sign the citation in lieu of arrest, as provided in §7-63-104.

Acts 1986, ch. 832, § 4.

7-63-204. Failure of offender to appear for trial.

Failure of the offender to appear for trial after signing of the ordinance summons agreement shall cause the court having jurisdiction to issue a warrant against the offender, as provided for in §7-63-105.

Acts 1986, ch. 832, § 5.